West Virginia, session 2026, HB5511.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER BENEFITS. §18A-4-10b. Optional payment to employee in lump sum amount for accrued and unused leave upon death; no withholding of any employee contribution deduction; exception. Every full-time employee of a county board, at the time his or her active employment ends due to death, may be paid in a lump sum amount to the personal representative of the estate of the employee for accrued and unused personal leave at the employee's usual rate of pay at the time the employment ends. The lump sum payment may not exceed $6,000. The lump sum payment may not include deductions for contributions toward retirement and may not be a part of final average salary computation. The lump sum payment shall be made within one month after the request. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home